pt-BR: Estilo do parapeito de ponte: Corrimão em arco; Corrimão de dupla face; Sem corrimão; Corrimão de poste e corda; Corrimão de um só lado; Outro
bg-BG: Стил на парапета на моста: Парапет тип "арка"; Двустранен парапет; Без парапет; Парапет със стълбове и въжета; Едностранен парапет; Друго
es: Estilo de barandilla de puente: Barandilla de arco; Barandilla de doble cara; Sin barandilla; Barandilla de postes y cuerdas; Barandilla de un solo lado; Otros
pt-PT: Estilo de guarda-corpo de ponte: Corrimão em arco; Corrimão de dupla face; Sem corrimão; Corrimão de poste e corda; Corrimão de um só lado; Outro
en: Bridge railing style: Arch railing; Double-side railing; No railing; Post and rope railing; Single-side railing; Other
sv: Typ av broräcke: Bågräcke; Dubbelsidigt räcke; Utan räcke; Stolpe- och repräcke; Enkelsidigt räcke; Övrigt
hu: Hídkorlát stílusa: Íves korlát; Kétoldalas korlát; Nincs korlát; Oszlop- és kötélkorlát; Egyoldalas korlát; Egyéb
ja: 橋欄干のスタイル: アーチ手すり; 両面手すり; 手すりなし; ポストとロープの手すり; 片側手すり; その他
tr: Köprü korkuluk stili: Kemerli korkuluk; Çift taraflı korkuluk; Korkuluksuz; Direk ve halatlı korkuluk; Tek taraflı korkuluk; Diğer
fi: Sillankaiteen tyyli: Kaarikaide; Kaksipuolinen kaide; Ei kaiteita; Tolppa- ja köysikaide; Yksipuolinen kaide; Muu
th: รูปแบบราวสะพาน: ราวบันไดทรงโค้ง; ราวบันไดสองด้าน; ไม่มีราวบันได; ราวบันไดแบบเสาพร้อมเชือก; ราวบันไดด้านเดียว; อื่นๆ
nb: Rekkverksstil for bro: Rekkverk i buen; Dobbeltsidig rekkverk; Ingen rekkverk; Stolpe- og taurekkverk; Enkeltsidig rekkverk; Annet
lt-LT: Tilto turėklų stilius: Arkos turėklai; Dvipusis turėklas; Be turėklų; Stulpų ir virvių turėklai; Vienpusis turėklas; Kita
zh-CN: 桥梁栏杆样式: 拱形栏杆; 双侧栏杆; 无栏杆; 立柱和绳索栏杆; 单侧栏杆; 其他
nl: Stijl van de brugleuning: Boogvormige leuning; Dubbelzijdige leuning; Geen leuning; Paal- en touwleuning; Enkelzijdige leuning; Overig
ko: 브리지 난간 스타일: 아치형 난간; 양면 난간; 난간 없음; 기둥과 밧줄 난간; 한쪽 난간; 기타
pl: Typ poręczy mostku: Balustrada łukowa; Balustrada dwustronna; Brak balustrady; Balustrada słupkowo-linowa; Balustrada jednostronna; Pozostałe
fr: Style des garde-corps du pont: Garde-corps en arc; Garde-corps double face; Pas de garde-corps; Garde-corps à poteaux et cordes; Garde-corps simple face; Autre
cs: Konstrukce zábradlí mostu: Obloukové zábradlí; Oboustranné zábradlí; Bez zábradlí; Sloupkové zábradlí s lanem; Jednostranné zábradlí; Jiné
vi: Kiểu lan can cầu: Lan can vòm; Lan can hai mặt; Không có lan can; Cột và lan can dây thừng; Lan can một bên; Khác
sk-SK: Štýl mostného zábradlia: Oblúkové zábradlie; Obojstranné zábradlie; Bez zábradlia; Zábradlie zo stĺpikov a lana; Jednostranné zábradlie; Iné
sl-SI: Slog ograje mostu: Ločna ograja; Dvostranska ograja; Brez ograje; Ograja iz stebrov in vrvi; Enostranska ograja; Druga
da: Brorækværkstil: Rækværk med bue; Dobbeltsidet rækværk; Intet rækværk; Rækværk med stolpe og rem; Enkeltsidet rækværk; Andet
de: Brückengeländer-Stil: Bogengeländer; Doppelseitiges Geländer; Kein Geländer; Pfosten- und Seilgeländer; Einseitiges Geländer; Sonstiges
hr-HR: Stil ograde mosta: Zaobljena ograda; Obostrana ograda; Bez ograde; Ograda sa stupovima i užem; Jednostrana ograda; Ostalo
zh-TW: 橋樑護欄樣式: 拱形欄杆; 雙側護欄; 無欄杆; 立柱和繩索欄杆; 單側欄杆; 其他
el: Στυλ κιγκλιδώματος γέφυρας: Κιγκλίδωμα αψίδας; Διπλό πλευρικό κιγκλίδωμα; Χωρίς κιγκλίδωμα; Κιγκλίδωμα από στύλους και σχοινιά; Μονόπλευρο κιγκλίδωμα; Άλλο
ru: Стиль перил моста: Арочные перила; Двухсторонние перила; Без перил; Столбы и веревочные перила; Односторонние перила; Другое
ro-RO: Stilul balustradei de pod: Balustradă arcuită; Balustradă dublă; Fără balustradă; Balustradă cu stâlpi și frânghie; Balustradă pe o singură parte; Altele
it: Stile ringhiera del ponte: Ringhiera ad arco; Ringhiera bifacciale; Nessuna ringhiera; Ringhiera con palo e corda; Ringhiera monolaterale; Altro